Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-218
Mortgage loan, defined.

Mortgage loan shall mean an interest-bearing obligation which may be secured by a mortgage or such other security as the authority deems appropriate.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 21.